src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Pronouns
!!! Direct
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dir:akó # ;      ! 1st person singular
ako+v2+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dir:ko # ;      ! 1st person singular short
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Du1+Dir:tiká # ;     ! 1st person dual
ako+v2+Pron+Pers+Du1+Dir:taká # ;     ! 1st person dual
!!versions: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cebuano_grammar#Pronouns
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Incl+Dir:kitá # ;     ! 1st person inclusive
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Incl+Dir:tá # ;     ! 1st person inclusive short
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Excl+Dir:kamí # ;     ! 1st person exclusive
ako+v2+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Excl+Dir:mi # ;     ! 1st person exclusive short
ikaw+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dir:ikáw # ;     ! 2nd person singular
ikaw+v2+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dir:ka # ;     ! 2nd person singular short
ikaw+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Dir:kamó # ;     ! 2nd person plural
ikaw+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Dir:mo # ;     ! 2nd person plural short
siya+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dir:siyá # ;     ! 3rd person singular
siya+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dir:sya # ;     ! 3rd person singular short
siya+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Dir:silá # ;     ! 3rd person plural

 !!! Indirect (Genitive)
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Idr:ako # ;       ! 1st person singular
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Idr+Lig:ako##ng # ;       ! 1st person singular
ako+v2+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Idr:akoa # ;       ! 1st person singular
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Idr+Po:nàko # ;       ! 1st person singular
ako+v2+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Idr+Po:ko # ;       ! 1st person singular short

ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Incl+Idr:ato # ;    ! 1st person inclusive
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Incl+Idr:ato##ng # ;    ! 1st person inclusive
ako+v2+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Incl+Idr:atoa # ;    ! 1st person inclusive
ako+v2+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Incl+Idr:atoa##ng # ;    ! 1st person inclusive
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Incl+Idr+Po:natò # ;    ! 1st person inclusive
ako+v2+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Incl+Idr+Po:ta # ;    ! 1st person inclusive short
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Excl+Idr:amò # ;    ! 1st person exclusive
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Excl+Idr+Lig:amo##ng # ;    ! 1st person exclusive
ako+v2+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Excl+Idr:amoa # ;    ! 1st person exclusive
ako+v2+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Excl+Idr:amo##ng # ;    ! 1st person exclusive
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Excl+Idr+Po:namò # ;    ! 1st person exclusive
ikaw+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Idr:imo # ;       ! 2nd person singular
ikaw+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Idr+Lig:imo##ng # ;       ! 2nd person singular
ikaw+v2+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Idr:imoha # ;       ! 2nd person singular
ikaw+v2+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Idr+Lig:imoha##ng # ;       ! 2nd person singular
ikaw+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Idr+Po:nimo # ;       ! 2nd person singular
ikaw+v2+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Idr+Po:mo # ;       ! 2nd person singular short
ikaw+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Idr:inyo # ;    ! 2nd person plural
ikaw+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Idr+Lig:inyo##ng # ;    ! 2nd person plural
ikaw+v2+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Idr:inyoha # ;    ! 2nd person plural
ikaw+v2+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Idr:inyoha##ng # ;    ! 2nd person plural
ikaw+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Idr+Po:ninyo # ;    ! 2nd person plural
ikaw+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Idr+Po:ninyo##ng # ;    ! 2nd person plural
siya+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Idr:iya # ;     ! 3rd person singular
siya+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Idr+Lig:iya##ng # ;     ! 3rd person singular
siya+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Idr:iyaha # ;     ! 3rd person singular
siya+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Idr:iyaha##ng # ;     ! 3rd person singular
siya+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Idr+Po:niya # ;     ! 3rd person singular
siya+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Idr+Po:niya##ng # ;     ! 3rd person singular
siya+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Idr:ila # ;     ! 3rd person plural
siya+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Idr+Lig:ila##ng # ;     ! 3rd person plural
siya+v2+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Idr:ilaha # ;     ! 3rd person plural
siya+v2+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Idr:ilaha##ng # ;     ! 3rd person plural
siya+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Idr+Po:nila # ;     ! 3rd person plural
siya+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Idr+Po:nila##ng # ;     ! 3rd person plural

 !!! Oblique
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Obl:kanakò # ;     ! 1st person singular
ako+v2+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Obl:nakò # ;     ! 1st person singular short
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Incl+Obl:kanatò # ;     ! 1st person inclusive
ako+v2+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Incl+Obl:natò # ;     ! 1st person inclusive short
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Excl+Obl:kanamò # ;     ! 1st person exclusive
ako+v2+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Excl+Obl:namò # ;     ! 1st person exclusive
ikaw+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Obl:kanimo # ;      ! 2nd person singular
ikaw+v2+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Obl:kanimo # ;      ! 2nd person singular short
ikaw+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Obl:kaninyó # ;     ! 2nd person plural
ikaw+v2+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Obl:ninyó # ;     ! 2nd person plural short
siya+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Obl:kaniya # ;   ! 3rd person singular
siya+v2+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Obl:niya # ;   ! 3rd person singular short
siya+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Obl:kanila # ;   ! 3rd person plural
siya+v2+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Obl:nila # ;   ! 3rd person plural short
